lib/dict/sl_SI.aff
SFX G Y 60
SFX G   am      ati     am
SFX G   am      a¹      am
SFX G   am      a       am
SFX G   am      ava     am
SFX G   am      ata     am
SFX G   am      amo     am
SFX G   am      ate     am
SFX G   am      ajo     am
SFX G   am      aj      am
SFX G   am      ajva    am
SFX G   am      ajta    am
SFX G   am      ajmo    am
SFX G   am      ajte    am
SFX G   ¹im     ¹ati    ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹i¹     ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹i      ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹iva    ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹ita    ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹imo    ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹ite    ¹im
SFX G   ¹im     ¹ijo    ¹im
SFX G   ¾em     zati    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾e¹     ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾e      ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾eva    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾eta    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾emo    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾ete    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾ejo    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾i      ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾iva    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾ita    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾imo    ¾em
SFX G   ¾em     ¾ite    ¾em
SFX G   ¹em     sati    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹e¹     ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹e      ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹eva    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹eta    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹emo    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹ete    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹ejo    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹i      ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹iva    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹ita    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹imo    ¹em
SFX G   ¹em     ¹ite    ¹em
SFX G   èem     cati    èem
SFX G   èem     èe¹     èem
SFX G   èem     èe      èem
SFX G   èem     èeva    èem
SFX G   èem     èeta    èem
SFX G   èem     èemo    èem
SFX G   èem     èete    èem
SFX G   èem     èejo    èem
SFX G   èem     èi      èem
SFX G   èem     èiva    èem
SFX G   èem     èita    èem
SFX G   èem     èimo    èem
SFX G   èem     èite    èem

SFX H Y 21
SFX H   im      eti     im
SFX H   im      i¹      im
SFX H   im      i       im
SFX H   im      iva     im
SFX H   im      ita     im
SFX H   im      imo     im
SFX H   im      ite     im
SFX H   im      ijo     im
SFX H   em      eti     em
SFX H   em      e¹      em
SFX H   em      e       em
SFX H   em      eva     em
SFX H   em      eta     em
SFX H   em      emo     em
SFX H   em      ete     em
SFX H   em      ejo     em
SFX H   em      ej      em
SFX H   em      ejva    em
SFX H   em      ejta    em
SFX H   em      ejmo    em
SFX H   em      ejte    em

SFX F Y 34
SFX F   im      iti     im
SFX F   im      i¹      im
SFX F   im      i       im
SFX F   im      iva     im
SFX F   im      ita     im
SFX F   im      imo     im
SFX F   im      ite     im
SFX F   im      ijo     im
SFX F   em      iti     [^j]em
SFX F   em      e¹      [^j]em
SFX F   em      e       [^j]em
SFX F   em      eva     [^j]em
SFX F   em      eta     [^j]em
SFX F   em      emo     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ete     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ejo     [^j]em
SFX F   em      i       [^j]em
SFX F   em      iva     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ita     [^j]em
SFX F   em      imo     [^j]em
SFX F   em      ite     [^j]em
SFX F   jem     ti      jem
SFX F   jem     je¹     jem
SFX F   jem     je      jem
SFX F   jem     jeva    jem
SFX F   jem     jeta    jem
SFX F   jem     jemo    jem
SFX F   jem     jete    jem
SFX F   jem     jejo    jem
SFX F   jem     j       jem
SFX F   jem     jva     jem
SFX F   jem     jta     jem
SFX F   jem     jmo     jem
SFX F   jem     jte     jem

SFX I Y 16
SFX I   èem     èi      èem
SFX I   èem     èe¹     èem
SFX I   èem     èe      èem
SFX I   èem     èeva    èem
SFX I   èem     èeta    èem
SFX I   èem     èemo    èem
SFX I   èem     èete    èem
SFX I   èem     èejo    èem
SFX I   ¾em     èi      ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾e¹     ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾e      ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾eva    ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾eta    ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾emo    ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾ete    ¾em
SFX I   ¾em     ¾ejo    ¾em

SFX V Y 4
SFX V   0       va      .
SFX V   0       ta      .
SFX V   0       mo      .
SFX V   0       te      .

SFX L Y 5
SFX L   ti      l       ti
SFX L   ti      la      ti
SFX L   ti      li      ti
SFX L   ti      le      ti
SFX L   ti      lo      ti

SFX T Y 1
SFX T   ti      t       ti

SFX U Y 1
SFX U   ti      n       ti

SFX W Y 1
SFX W   ti      je      ti

SFX Y Y 1
SFX Y   ti      joè     ti

SFX E Y 26
SFX E   im      i¹      im
SFX E   im      i       im
SFX E   im      iva     im
SFX E   im      ita     im
SFX E   im      imo     im
SFX E   im      ite     im
SFX E   im      ijo     im
SFX E   e¹      0       e¹
SFX E   e¹      em      e¹
SFX E   e¹      e       e¹
SFX E   e¹      eva     e¹
SFX E   e¹      eta     e¹
SFX E   e¹      emo     e¹
SFX E   e¹      ete     e¹
SFX E   e¹      ejo     e¹
SFX E   e¹      mo      e¹
SFX E   e¹      ta      e¹
SFX E   e¹      te      e¹
SFX E   e¹      va      e¹
SFX E   em      e¹      em
SFX E   em      e       em
SFX E   em      eva     em
SFX E   em      eta     em
SFX E   em      emo     em
SFX E   em      ete     em
SFX E   em      ejo     em

SFX A Y 4
SFX A   0       a       .
SFX A   0       e       .
SFX A   0       i       .
SFX A   0       o       .

SFX N Y 65
SFX N   0       na      lj
SFX N   0       nu      lj
SFX N   0       nom     lj
SFX N   0       nov     lj
SFX N   0       noma    lj
SFX N   0       nih     lj
SFX N   0       ni      lj
SFX N   0       ne      lj
SFX N   ro      ra      ro
SFX N   ro      ru      ro
SFX N   ro      rom     ro
SFX N   ro      ri      ro
SFX N   ro      er      ro
SFX N   ro      roma    ro
SFX N   ro      rih     ro
SFX N   o       a       [^r]o
SFX N   o       u       [^r]o
SFX N   o       om      [^r]o
SFX N   o       i       [^r]o
SFX N   o       oma     [^r]o
SFX N   o       ih      [^r]o
SFX N   je      ja      je
SFX N   je      ju      je
SFX N   je      jem     je
SFX N   je      ji      je
SFX N   je      ij      je
SFX N   je      jema    je
SFX N   je      jih     je
SFX N   0       na      [^j]e
SFX N   0       nu      [^j]e
SFX N   0       nom     [^j]e
SFX N   0       ni      [^j]e
SFX N   0       n       [^j]e
SFX N   0       noma    [^j]e
SFX N   0       nih     [^j]e
SFX N   i       a       i
SFX N   i       e       i
SFX N   i       o       i
SFX N   ih      i       ih
SFX N   ih      om      ih
SFX N   ih      ov      ih
SFX N   e¹      em      e¹
SFX N   e¹      e       e¹
SFX N   e¹      eva     e¹
SFX N   e¹      eta     e¹
SFX N   e¹      emo     e¹
SFX N   e¹      ete     e¹
SFX N   e¹      ejo     e¹
SFX N   e¹      mo      e¹
SFX N   e¹      ta      e¹
SFX N   e¹      te      e¹
SFX N   e¹      va      e¹
SFX N   an      ne      an
SFX N   an      neva    an
SFX N   an      nevu    an
SFX N   an      nevom   an
SFX N   an      nevoma  an
SFX N   an      nevih   an
SFX N   an      neh     an
SFX N   an      nema    an
SFX N   an      nem     an
SFX N   an      nemi    an
SFX N   an      neve    an
SFX N   an      nevi    an
SFX N   an      ni      an
