lib/dict/sl_SI.dic
balansirati/YTLU
prikrivati/WYTUL
menjuje/XVD
lotil/ADB
umrljivosti/T
rdim/HDB
¹tipendirati/YTLU
nadvladuje¹/E
ostajati/WTLXY
gniti/LTWY
obvladovati/WTL
frfoèem/I
topotnem/F
razvitje/N
dople¹em/G
krastaè/A
ljubkuj/V
suhoparnosti/T
vzdr¾ujem/E
zvrtati/LUT
debatirati/WLTY
pripekati/WYLT
izparim/H
pravim/BDOF
ujèkal/A
graditi/TL
destabiliziram/G
povelièuje/V
iztezati/WYTL
Gvatemali/N
asfaltirati/TLUY
zvleèem/I
zasledujem/E
obleèem/CI
obèuti/WYV
prestrelim/F
zabil/BA
jecljati/WYTL
trohnim/H
glasuj/CVX
odropoèem/I
uspeti/LT
predgreti/WLT
posivim/F
priletim/H
zajedam/G
povratni¹tvo/N
mekeèem/I
popravljati/WTLUY
dogovarjal/A
namotavati/WYTL
izglasovati/U
poveljuje¹/E
remizirati/YTUL
pribli¾a/V
nosati/T
drgeèem/ID
vedeti/DXLT
odjavljati/WTLY
©etin/MA
rubim/DF
gospoduje¹/ED
realizirati/TUL
obdaja/V
pri¹tevam/G
sozvenim/H
grajati/TLUWY
kombinirati/TLUY
prisojati/WYLT
oglu¹eti/LUT
troposferi/N
zalezovati/WTL
Sostrèank/A
spodvijem/F
kapljati/YWTL
botrujem/E
razi¹èem/I
nastiljati/WYLT
dresira/V
temnim/BHF
spodbosti/T
¹trbunknem/F
obsedeti/TLU
Luzonèank/A
listam/OBGC
pape¾evati/WTL
polirati/WYTUL
naroèujem/E
spametovati/WTL
mre/BVDC
nanizati/U
premoèljivosti/T
spodbodli/N
Grahovk/A
daruje¹/E
otovorim/F
vrtnari/V
banaliziram/G
izneveriti/TL
vegetirati/YLT
akreditirati/YTUL
pogozdovati/WTL
dopustnosti/T
obremenjujoè/AC
strdim/F
prizadem/H
zarotni¹tvo/N
darujem/E
mobilizira/V
opoteèem/I
povzemati/TLY
raztrgati/TUL
i¹èem/IBC
noèem/I
reèem/IDBX
suèem/IDC
tièem/IXD
toèim/BFOXC
znojnosti/T
pomirjujem/E
kontaminirati/YTLU
zapletati/WTLY
splahnim/HF
odpi¹e/V
sestavljam/G
Friziji/N
pogre¹ati/YLUT
zmerjavk/A
nagubanèenosti/T
pregrajuje¹/E
Cveti/UT
razjoèem/I
preslikuje/V
vpisovati/WLT
¹èitim/DF
nastlati/TLU
èrtam/GDC
za¾venkeèem/I
po¹kodovati/U
doraslosti/T
podpluti/TLW
samoocenjuje¹/E
napre¾em/I
Senovici/N
molim/HF
pripominjati/TLWY
vzklikam/G
taljiv/A
poèepne/V
pregovarjati/YWLT
kaloti/T
izdihati/U
razsrdim/F
licitirati/WLTY
zebri/N
skomigati/YWTL
¹èegeèem/I
opevati/YWTLU
stapljam/G
krvavim/XHD
oslepariti/TL
sesipljem/E
prislinil/A
izvajati/YTLUW
pooseblja/V
¹tudirati/YULT
flambirati/YULT
ume¹am/G
planinarim/F
vra¾ji/N
motim/HF
o¾ivljati/WLTY
v¾ivljati/WLTY
poostrovati/WTLU
personalisti/T
kamenjam/G
oskrbuje¹/E
mrtvim/HF
svetlic/A
tleskati/TLYW
oblepim/F
zbolj¹evati/LTW
razmesari/V
oble¾ati/ULT
Zabukovici/N
kramljati/YWLT
preklapljam/G
opeèem/I
smuèem/I
tolèem/IDBCO
zjoèem/I
obesim/FX
preventivnosti/T
odrekati/YTL
frèi/V
peniti/ULT
ponujal/A
de¾uje¹/E
Èe¹èi/N
obhajam/G
rolka/V
bolim/HDC
odskaèem/I
godrnjati/YWTL
trapiti/TLU
korigiram/G
iredentistk/A
¾ogati/YWTL
sarabandi/N
razrijem/F
zaobjemljem/E
prognostiènosti/T
rumeniti/TU
obvesti/V
o¾alostiti/LT
pre¹iti/TW
odpekeèem/I
zgornji/N
zaluèam/G
za¾arim/H
prilivati/WYLT
apeliran/A
pluti/XWDLTC
samounièujem/E
rignem/F
posplo¹uje/V
splakovati/WTL
izkljuvati/U
simpatizirati/LTWY
odracam/G
rezgeèem/ID
speljati/TLU
Fontainih/N
prepovedujem/E
domi¹ljij/A
zatrdim/H
po¹lje/V
opona¹ati/TLY
oplemenititi/TL
gospodinjim/F
¹rafiram/G
robkati/YLTW
organizirati/TLUY
Podhru¹ki/N
oprezovati/LTW
oglenim/BFH
zgleduje¹/E
prezimujoè/A
buljim/FX
osonèi/V
odpraskati/LT
neham/GCB
Veiti/T
sekirati/TLWY
Primèi/N
oslepim/HF
na¹minkati/U
dilatiram/G
odhrèem/I
raz¹iriti/TL
izvr¹ujem/E
¾elim/BHD
huligank/A
sprijemati/YWLT
polnim/OFDX
spridi/V
polemiziram/G
vzdrhtim/H
jastrebji/N
pomenljivosti/T
pogovarjati/YTLW
vkljuèevati/LUTW
vzredim/F
abonirati/ULTY
razveseljujem/E
Gumberk/A
zavedam/G
zapenjati/WTLY
vtri/V
razkaèiti/LT
cedri/N
¾uborim/H
pripravim/F
utrinjati/WYLT
¾dim/HC
iztovarjam/G
usedem/E
oporeèem/I
aktivirati/LUTY
najdenin/A
zdrsim/H
stkati/ULT
krhati/YLTW
zajedati/YTLW
izletni¹tvo/N
odstri¾em/I
oskruni/V
zagrevam/G
zasu¾njim/F
vme¹avati/TLY
koprnim/H
uplahniti/LT
militaristiènosti/T
obtipljem/E
stare¹instvo/N
kupèujoè/CA
planirati/ULT
muzati/YLTW
izkori¹èam/G
lebdim/H
prepisuje/V
razposoditi/TL
uklonim/F
izjedati/YWTL
pristri¾em/I
sovpadati/WTLY
po¾rtvovalnosti/T
Kozani/N
od¹kodujem/E
vdam/OG
vdrl/A
pripenjati/TLWY
kockati/YLUTW
ohripim/H
razporedim/CF
obubo¾am/G
aklimatizira/V
poku¹ati/LTWY
angle¹èini/N
arditi/T
nadzidati/TUL
poizvedovati/WLT
vtetoviral/A
unièujem/E
kanoniziram/G
obnemim/H
razkaèim/F
Brk/A
veze/VX
strojevodji/N
razkisati/TUL
cincati/LTYW
kidati/YWLT
upijanjam/G
uzakonjuje¹/E
sladkosnednosti/T
ugajal/A
vplujem/F
ropoèem/DI
odhrumim/H
stre¾em/ICB
subvencionirati/TUL
Lahinji/N
rimati/ULTYW
izku¹am/GBC
odloèuj/V
izku¹ati/CYBLT
v¹tevati/TLYW
vsrkavajoè/A
v¾ivim/H
prevladuje¹/E
kleèeplazim/F
konzultirati/ULTY
ilegali/N
zagrevati/YTLW
regulirati/YULT
evakuirati/YULT
marinira/V
povelièevati/WULT
Verjank/A
ovdovim/H
grdosti/T
pomno¾uje¹/E
razpoznam/G
©alki/N
zrinem/F
sprovocirati/ULT
ravsati/YLTW
tvoj/A
klokoèem/I
klikne/V
¹avsati/LTY
su¹im/XFCBDO
skritje/N
speljevati/LTW
osemenjuje¹/E
nerogati/T
remiziram/G
naravnavati/YTL
izsrkati/U
d¾ezvi/N
glos/A
gnusim/FD
pe¹aèi/CV
ni¾em/I
dr¾im/DBE
rjovim/DH
trobezljati/TLYW
medsebojnosti/T
ustolièiti/TL
variirati/YTUL
uglasbim/F
ime/N
prikazati/ULT
razbolim/H
zadol¾uje¹/E
zagnu¹en/A
kara/BV
dosegam/G
prekrokati/ULT
klopoèem/I
pomanj¹evati/LTW
vzbrstim/H
Nizozemski/N
spoznavati/YTL
blejem/E
zatisnem/F
sankati/YLT
pirotehnik/MA
sprevrni/V
brisati/UT
zletim/H
Tesli/N
akvaristi/T
re¾irati/TULYW
